Tennessee, session 114, HB2104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-5-105(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "two (2) days" and substituting "three (3) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2104
012283
- 1 -